Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-131.03
Housing accommodations; modification; not required.

Nothing in sections 20-131.01 to 20-131.04 shall require any person who rents, leases, or provides housing accommodations for compensation to modify such person's property in any way to accommodate the special needs of any lessee.

Laws 1975, LB 83, § 3.